src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
sädelev+A:sädelev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sähviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ähviv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
säilitav+A:säilitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@säiliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘äiliv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@särav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@särav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
sätendav+A:sätendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sööbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ööbiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@söödav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘öödav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sööv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ööv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sügav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sügav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
sülitav+A:sülitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sündiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ünʲdiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
sünteesiv+A:sünt˘eesiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sütitav+A:sütʲitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@süttiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ütʲtiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
süvenev+A:süvenev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
süüdistatav+A:süüdistatav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
süüdistav+A:süüdistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@süüdiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘üüdiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
šokeeriv+A:šok˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taanduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aanduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taaruv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aaruv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taastuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aastuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tabatav+A:tabatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tabav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tabav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tagandatav+A:tagandatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
taganev+A:taganev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tagastatav+A:tagastatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tagav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tagav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taipav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aipav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tajutav+A:tajutav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
takerduv+A:takerduv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
takistav+A:takistav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
taltsutatav+A:taltsutatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
talutav+A:talutav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tammuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ammuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tantsisklev+A:tanʲtsisklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@taotlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘aotlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tarbiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘arbiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
targutav+A:targutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
targutlev+A:targutlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tarvitatav+A:tarvitatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tasuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tasuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
taunitav+A:taunitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tauniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘auniv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@teatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘eatav MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
teenindav+A:teenindav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@teeniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘eeniv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tegelev+A:tegelev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tegev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tegev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
tegutsev+A:tegutsev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tehtav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ehtav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
tekitav+A:tekitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tekkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ekkiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
teostatav+A:t˘eostatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@teostav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘eostav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@terav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@terav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
tervendav+A:tervendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
tervitatav+A:tervitatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tihenev+A:tihenev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tilkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ilkuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tingiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ingiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
toetatav+A:t˘oetatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toetav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oetav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toetuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oetuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toibuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oibuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toimiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oimiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toimuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oimuv MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toodav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oodav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
toodetav+A:toodetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@toov+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘oov MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
toretsev+A:toretsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@torkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘orkav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@torkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘orkiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tormav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ormav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
tormitsev+A:tormitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tormlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ormlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tossav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ossav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@trotsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tr˘otʲsiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tudisev+A:tudisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tugev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tugev MAGUS  "weight: 5 " ; 
tuginev+A:tuginev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
tuhisev+A:tuhisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tujutsev+A:tujutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tukkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ukkuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tulenev+A:tulenev MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
tulev+A:tulev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tulvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ulvav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tundlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘undlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tunduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘unduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tungiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ungiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tunnetatav+A:tunnetatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
tunnustatav+A:tunnustatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tunnustav+A:tunnustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tuntav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘untav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
turgutav+A:turgutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tuttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘uttav MAGUS  "weight: 5 " ; 
tutvustav+A:tutvustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tõestatav+A:t˘õestatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
tõkestav+A:tõkestav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
tõlgendatav+A:tõlgendatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmbav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õmbav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmblev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õmblev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõmbuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õmbuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõotav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õotav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõrjuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õrjuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõrkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õrkuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õtlev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õttav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tõukav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘õukav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
täheldatav+A:täheldatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
täidetav+A:täidetav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@täiendav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@täiendav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@täituv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘äituv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
täpsustav+A:täpsustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tärkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘ärkav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tögav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@tögav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@töötav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘öötav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@töötlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘öötlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
tülgastav+A:tülgastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tüssav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘üssav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@tüütav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@t˘üütav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
uimastav+A:uimastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@uinuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘uinuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ujuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@ujuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ulatuv+A:ulatuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
uljutsev+A:ulʲjutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ulpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ulʲpiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
unistav+A:unistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@uppuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘uppuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
usaldatav+A:usaldatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
usaldav+A:usaldav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ustav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘ustav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
uudistav+A:uudistav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@uuriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@˘uuriv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
vaadeldav+A:vaadeldav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaagiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aagiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@vaatav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@v˘aatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vabandatav+A:vabandatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
vabandav+A:vabandav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
vabanev+A:vabanev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
vabastav+A:vabastav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
